Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-1404. Effect on appropriation acts.

All appropriation acts of all institutions of higher education subject to this subchapter shall be governed by this subchapter with respect to grades, class titles, salary increases, salary increase eligibility, and other provisions unless special language in the appropriation act of the institution specifically allows the institution to provide salary increases, grade assignments, class title assignments, salary increase eligibility, and other provisions different from those provided by this subchapter.

When the intent of the General Assembly, by amendment to appropriation bills, is to allow a higher grade for a classification than that listed in this subchapter, the grade assigned to the classification in the appropriation act for the classification, as designated with the higher grade, shall be the grade for the classification in the institution during the biennium.

When a higher grade is authorized in this subchapter for classifications that are not reflected in the appropriation act of an institution, this subchapter shall set the grades to be authorized in an institution's appropriation act for the biennium unless special language in the appropriation act of an institution allows the institution to provide salary increases other than that provided in this subchapter.

It is the intent of this section that the institutions governed by this subchapter be authorized to allow grades as provided in the appropriation acts of the institutions, provided that the rules that apply to salary increases under this subchapter shall not be waived unless special language in the appropriation act of the institution authorizes the institution to provide increases other than those authorized under this subchapter.

Determine that each position of an institution of higher education affected by this subchapter is allocated to a class having a written class specification based on the duties and responsibilities assigned to the position and the requirements necessary to satisfactorily perform the duties;

Assist institutions in the allocation of positions to classes established in this subchapter and in the appropriation acts covering each of the institutions affected by this subchapter, and disallow the allocation of a position to a class that is not in conformance with this subchapter;

Authorize the temporary reclassification of positions in an institution affected by this subchapter in cases in which it has been determined by the division that there are material changes in the duties and responsibilities assigned to the position when there is no available vacant position having the proper classification and when it is impracticable to restructure the duties of the position to the proper classification.

The reclassification of positions may also be authorized when it is necessary to establish a new classification to meet federal standards as a prerequisite for federal programs, provided that a position is not placed in a class and receive pay at a salary rate in excess of the maximum salary rate authorized for the position that was reclassified as provided in the appropriation act of the institution;

Review all class specifications and all classes and grades and the compensation plan affecting all institutions covered by this subchapter and submit to the Legislative Council and the Governor in advance of the regular session and fiscal session of the General Assembly recommendations for revisions, modifications, or additions.

When necessary, the division shall confer with the staff of the Legislative Council on the development of and revisions to uniform classification and compensation systems.

Time periods for the development of recommendations and time periods for the review by the Legislative Council of those recommendations shall be as established by the Legislative Council.

The time periods for recommendations and for review shall be sufficiently in advance of budget hearings for the regular session and fiscal session to allow for the thorough review by the Legislative Council;

Develop and implement rules to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter;

Establish a procedure to allow the head of the institution to review the qualifications of applicants whose education and experience either do not meet or exceed that required by the class specification but who have other job-related qualifications that might be validly substituted for the class requirements.

The procedure under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section is intended to allow institutions to substitute job-related education and experience for the specific requirements stated in the class specification without the necessity for the revision of the class specification.

The procedure under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section shall require the final approval of the Director of the Division of Higher Education, with the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee;

Review institution personnel transactions reported as unqualified appointments.

Unqualified appointments shall be reported by the division to the Legislative Council unless one (1) of the following actions is taken:

Questionable appointments are reviewed by the director;

Payroll actions for questionable appointments that are determined by the director to be unqualified for the specific appointment are not processed until the unqualified appointment is removed from the payroll or is placed into a position in the institution for which the individual meets the minimum qualifications of the classification; or

Corrective action is documented by the institution.

It is the specific responsibility of the head of each institution to certify that the qualifications of persons appointed to positions within the institution do meet or exceed the minimum education and experience requirements as stated in the class specification;

Establish each year, upon the review of the Personnel Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, new classifications at an appropriate grade in order to meet new or changed conditions and report at the end of each fiscal year all class titles contained in § 21-5-1406 for which a class specification has not been written.

Any classification established under this subdivision (a)(8) shall remain in effect for the remainder of the fiscal year during which the classification was established unless specifically authorized to continue by the General Assembly as an addition to this subchapter;

Revise, as necessary, the class specification of a classification in order to ensure the accuracy of the description of the assigned duties and the minimum requirements necessary to perform these duties and thereby maintain a valid relationship between the requirements and the duties and responsibilities of the jobs;

Administer and maintain a system for the evaluation of employee performance effectiveness;

Provide assistance to institutions in identifying, developing, and maintaining training and resource programs; and

Develop and implement, as needed and upon the review of the Legislative Council, rules to ensure a uniform system of personnel administration within higher education.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in the introductory language of (a) and in (a)(6)(C); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the table in (b).

The following grades and pay levels are the authorized pay plan, effective July 1, 2019, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of institutions covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the institution:

The following grades and pay levels are the authorized professional and executive pay plan, effective July 1, 2017, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of institutions covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and professional and executive salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the institution:

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the compensation plans in this section shall be implemented and function in compliance with other provisions in this subchapter and other fiscal control laws of this state, when applicable.

With the approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, salaries established by this section may exceed the maximum pay level for the grade assigned by the classification by no more than twenty-five percent (25%) for no more than ten percent (10%) of the positions authorized in the institution's appropriation act.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (e)(1); and added (g).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 inserted (b); redesignated and rewrote former (b) as (c); and deleted former (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (a), (b)(1)(A)(i) [now (c)(1)(A)], and (e).

Prevailing labor market conditions;

An extraordinarily well-qualified candidate;

The need to retain trained, competent employees;

An employee assigned additional duties as a result of the elimination of a position by an institution; or

To meet the requirements of state or federal laws.

The director may approve a special rate of pay under subdivision (d)(1) of this section above fifteen percent (15%) up to thirty percent (30%) above the minimum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification.

The division may approve a special rate of pay under subdivision (d)(1) of this section above thirty percent (30%) up to the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The division shall file a report of special rates of pay established under this subsection with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.

(1)The head of the institution may approve special rates of pay to retain a trained, competent employee or due to the assignment of additional duties as a result of the elimination of positions by the institution, subject to the following:

The assignment of additional duties is permanent and the duties assigned are beyond the scope of work currently being performed by the employee;

The same employee may not receive a special rate of pay under this subdivision (e)(1) more than one (1) time during a biennium; and

All increases up to ten percent (10%) approved under this subdivision (e)(1) shall be reported by the institution to the division, and increases above ten percent (10%) shall be approved by the division.

The division shall file a report of all salary increases established under this subsection with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval for review.

(1)(A)An employee promoted on or after July 1, 2019, shall receive a salary increase up to ten percent (10%).

However, an employee's rate of pay upon promotion shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the classification.

An employee who upon promotion is receiving a rate of pay below the minimum pay level established for the new grade shall be adjusted to the minimum pay level for that grade.

An employee who returns to a position in a classification the employee formerly occupied within a twelve-month period after promotion from the classification is eligible for a rate of pay no greater than that for which the employee would have been eligible had the employee remained in the lower-graded classification.

(1)(A)Upon demotion, an employee's pay shall be decreased by up to ten percent (10%).

However, an employee's rate of pay upon demotion shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the classification.

If the employee's salary falls below the lowest minimum pay level of the new grade upon demotion, his or her salary shall be adjusted to the minimum pay level for the grade.

If an employee accepts a new position that is a transfer, the employee may receive a change in pay, as follows:

If the employee's salary falls below the minimum pay level of the new grade, then his or her salary shall be adjusted to the minimum pay level for the grade; or

If a special rate of pay has been established under this section, then his or her salary shall be appropriately adjusted.

A transferring employee's rate of pay shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the new position unless otherwise authorized.

An employee who is placed in a lower-graded position on the same pay table because the original position has expired due to lack of funding, program changes, or withdrawal of federal grant funds may continue to be paid at the same rate as the employee was being paid in the higher-graded position upon approval of the division after seeking the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

If an employee who has been terminated for more than thirty (30) working days returns to service at the institution, the institution may offer up to the employee's last rate of pay not to exceed the maximum pay level established for the grade.

Upon transfer of employment between institutions, an employee shall receive a lump-sum payment from the original institution for any overtime that has been accrued and not been paid and for any compensatory time accrued that has not been used at the higher rate of either the:

Average regular rate of pay received by the employee during the last three (3) years of his or her employment; or

Final regular rate of pay received by the employee.

Any special rate of pay established under this section shall not affect the salary level or salary eligibility of any existing employee within the institution.

A special rate of pay is subject to the institution's ability to certify funding for a special rate of pay established under this section.

An institution shall not use merit adjustment funds for a special rate of pay established under this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” and “division” for “department” throughout the section.

The institution of higher education routinely schedules more than one (1) work shift per day;

The shift to which the employee is assigned is a full work shift; and

The employee is regularly assigned to the late shift or is assigned to the shift on a regularly scheduled rotating basis.

An employee assigned to an evening shift shall not receive additional compensation that exceeds six percent (6%) above that for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

An employee assigned to a night shift shall not receive additional compensation that exceeds twelve percent (12%) above that for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

An employee at or near the maximum authorized salary level for the grade assigned to his or her classification may be compensated at an additional rate not to exceed twelve percent (12%) of his or her eligible salary under this subchapter.

When granting additional compensation has the effect of temporarily exceeding the highest pay level for the grade assigned to the employee's classification, the additional compensation shall not be construed as exceeding the highest pay level for that grade.

(1)A person employed in areas providing critical support, custody, and care to designated client service units at state-operated inpatient hospital facilities, at state-operated human development centers, and at maximum security units at correctional facilities during weekend hours is eligible to receive up to twenty percent (20%) of the hourly rate for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter paid as a shift or weekend differential.

(1)If a facility uses shifts other than traditional eight-hour shifts, a shift differential may be paid for those shifts exceeding the normal day shift of the facility.

The shift schedule, classifications, positions, and the percentage of shift differential for which the class titles are eligible shall be submitted to the division for approval by the Director of the Division of Higher Education.

Subsequent changes to the shift schedule, classifications, grades, positions, and shift differential percentages shall receive prior approval by the director.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in the introductory language of (a)(1) and in (c)(3)(B); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(3)(B) and (e).

An employee who is receiving additional compensation under this section and then is reassigned to a normal shift shall revert on the day of the reassignment to the rate of pay for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

The division shall report all shift differential approvals to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

To address specific employee compensation needs not otherwise provided for in this subchapter, an institution of higher education may pay additional compensation for current employees in specific positions or for classifications of positions assigned to a compensation plan authorized by the General Assembly for one (1) or more compensation differentials.

(1)Authorization for one (1) or more compensation differentials may be approved if the:

Institution has documented the need for a compensation differential for specified positions or classifications;

Institution submits to the Division of Higher Education a plan of the terms and conditions for eligibility that must directly address the needs of the targeted positions or classifications for any requested compensation differential;

Cost of implementing and maintaining a compensation differential is within the institution's existing appropriation and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the institution; and

Compensation differential has been approved by the division after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The cumulative total of any compensation differentials paid to an employee shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the employee's base salary.

Any compensation differential authorized under this section shall be renewed each fiscal year.

(1)A hazardous duty differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be authorized for the increased risk of personal physical injury for an employee occupying a certain identified high-risk position if the:

Position classification is determined to be physically hazardous or dangerous due to location, facility, services provided, or other factors directly related to the duty assignment of the position; and

Employee's regularly assigned work schedule exposes him or her to clear, direct, and unavoidable hazards during at least fifty percent (50%) of the work time and the employee is not compensated for the hazardous exposure.

(A)The institution shall identify the facility or unit, location, and eligible positions and classifications within the facility or unit that are identified as high-risk.

The positions shall be certified by the institution as having been assigned to a work environment that poses an increased risk of personal injury and shall be submitted as part of the plan for payment of a hazardous duty differential to the division for approval by the Director of the Division of Higher Education after review and approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Subsequent changes to the facility or unit, location, and eligible positions or classifications within the facility or unit on file with the division shall receive prior approval by the director after review and approval by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

An employee who is receiving additional compensation for hazardous duty and then is reassigned to normal duty shall revert on the day of the reassignment to the rate of pay for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

It is the intent of this subsection that a hazardous duty differential shall be at the discretion of the director and the institution and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the institution.

(1)A professional certification differential of up to ten percent (10%) for job-related professional certifications for individual positions or for specific classifications within an institution may be authorized if the certification is:

From a recognized professional certifying organization and is determined to be directly related to the predominant purpose and use of the position or classification; and

Not included as a minimum qualification established or as a special requirement for the classification by the official class specification.

(A)A professional certification differential may be paid only while the certification is current and maintained by the employee and while the employee is employed in a position or classification covered by the compensation plan.

Documentation of continuation or renewal of the certification of the employee is required for continuation of the professional certification differential.

An education differential of up to ten percent (10%) for job-related education for individual positions or for specific classifications within an institution may be authorized if:

A geographic area differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be authorized to address the documented inability to recruit and retain certain employees in a specific geographic area of the state if the additional geographic area differential is based on a documented recruitment, turnover, or other competitive pay issue in a specific geographic area that does not justify a statewide labor market special entry rate.

(1)A second-language differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be authorized for an employee who has the demonstrated ability and skill to communicate in a language other than English, including American Sign Language, if that skill is determined by the institution to be directly related to the effective performance of the job duties for the position occupied by the employee.

(1)An on-call duty or standby-duty differential may be authorized for an employee whose job requires him or her to provide services on nights, weekends, or holidays or at other times or in other situations when the institution does not have regularly scheduled staff coverage.

Compensation shall not be paid to an employee required to be on on-call or standby duty who fails to respond after the second notification that his or her services are needed.

If the equipment or paging device malfunctions, the penalty under subdivision (h)(3)(B)(i) of this section shall not apply.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 inserted “to the Department of Higher Education” and “must” in (b)(1)(B); substituted “salary” for “pay level” in (b)(3); substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “six percent (6%)” in the introductory language of (c)(1); substituted “facility” for “facility or unit” in (c)(1)(A); substituted “institution” for “head of the requesting institution” and the second occurrence of “facility or unit” for “facility” in (c)(2)(A); substituted “institution” for “head of the institution” in (c)(2)(B); rewrote former (d) and redesignated it as (c)(3); redesignated former (e) as (c)(4); redesignated former (f) through (k) as (d) through (i); substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “six percent (6%)” in the introductory language of (d)(1); inserted “compensation” in (d)(2)(A); rewrote (e); substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “six percent (6%)” in (f); inserted “at other times or in” in (h)(1); substituted “or holidays or at other times or in other situations when the institution does not have regularly scheduled staff coverage is” for “and holidays shall be” in (h)(3)(A); inserted “under subdivision (h)(3)(B)(i) of this section” in (h)(3)(B)(ii); substituted “maximum pay level” for “maximum or the career pay level”, “considered” for “construed”, and “allowable rate” for “annual salary” in (i); added (j); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b)(1)(D) and (c)(2)(B); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2)(B) and (c)(2)(C).

An employee on on-call or standby duty who is called in to work shall be compensated for the actual hours worked at the appropriate rate of pay with a minimum of two (2) hours for each call-back.

The employee shall not be paid on-call or standby pay for hours actually worked during a call-back.

If granting additional compensation would have the effect of exceeding the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the employee's classification, the additional compensation shall not be considered as exceeding the maximum allowable rate for that grade.

Other compensation differentials may be administered by the division after:

(1)An institution of higher education may request that a salary administration grid be approved for specific classifications of positions assigned to the pay plan as established in § 21-5-1410 if the:

Institution has documented the need for a salary administration grid for specified positions or classifications;

Terms and conditions of a salary administration grid proposed by the institution address the needs of the targeted positions;

Cost of implementing and maintaining a salary administration grid is within the institution's existing appropriation and the implementation does not use funds specifically set aside for other programs within the institution; and

Salary administration grid has been approved by the Director of the Division of Higher Education after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

(A)Special rates of pay may be authorized up to the highest pay level authorized for the grade assigned the classification of a career service position for specific classifications only.

An approved salary administration grid shall be used for establishing the entry pay level for an employee in a position.

A person hired above the entry pay level shall meet or exceed the minimum qualifications for the job classification.

Subsequent salary determinations within a salary administration grid shall be based on the employee's qualifications, relevant competitive compensation rates, professional or educational achievements, and internal equity within the institution.

A plan of implementation and salary progression shall be approved by the Division of Higher Education on a biennial basis.

Compensation differentials that are included in an institution's grid plan shall not exceed rates provided in §21-5-1412.

An approved salary administration grid may be amended only upon approval by the division after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 substituted “pay plan as established in §21-5-1410” for “career service compensation plan” in the introductory language of (a)(1); and inserted “salary administration” in (a)(1)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” and “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “authorized classification” for “authorized career service classification or a professional and executive classification” in (a)(1); deleted “entry” following “minimum” in the introductory language of (b); and deleted (b)(4).

(1)A monthly report shall be made to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, describing all personnel transactions involving applications of this section.

(1)A position authorized as extra help in an institution of higher education shall be assigned an authorized classification by the institution, and any person hired in an extra help position shall meet the minimum qualifications and any other requirements set by the class specification of the classification and grade assigned to the position.

The salary eligibility for an employee transferring or returning from an extra help position to a regular position shall be established at the minimum pay level for the grade assigned by classification with the following exceptions:

A former employee from a state agency, institution, board, or commission who is rehired in an extra help position is ineligible for benefits except holiday pay.

(1)The Division of Higher Education shall establish and maintain a central pool of four hundred (400) positions to be used to establish additional positions in an institution of higher education when an institution does not have sufficient positions available to meet unanticipated enrollment growth, industry training demands, or its mandated responsibilities.

(1)The division shall establish and maintain a temporary transition pool of fifty (50) positions to be used to establish additional temporary positions of the proper classification and grade in an institution if the institution does not have sufficient positions available with the appropriate classification and grade to address organizational transition issues such as succession planning or other changes involving administration of the institution.

Requested by the institution;

Recommended by the division; and

Reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Temporary transition pool positions shall be authorized for not more than one hundred eighty (180) calendar days in a fiscal year and may not be renewed or extended.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and (b) as (a)(2); inserted (b) and (c) and redesignated former (c) through (f) as (d) through (g); added “or temporary transition pool” in (e); and rewrote (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d) and (e) [now (e) and (f)].

To receive the full amount authorized in subsection (c) of this section, the service shall have been in either elected positions or regular full-time positions.

Nonfaculty and classified employees of institutions who work part-time in regular salary positions may receive annual career service recognition payments on a pro rata basis.

Periods of authorized leave without pay and leave of absence for military service when veterans' reemployment rights are exercised shall not negate eligibility for the payment, provided all other eligibility requirements are met.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” twice in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 914, in (c), substituted “$800” for “$600”, “1,000” for “700”, “1,200” for “800”, and “1,500” for “900”.

The Division of Higher Education shall establish and publish policies and procedures for the administration of career service recognition payments to employees of institutions upon a determination by the Director of the Division of Higher Education that the respective institution has sufficient funds available for that purpose.

Nonfaculty and classified employees of institutions who meet eligibility requirements established by subsection (a) of this section shall become eligible for annual career service recognition payments on the anniversary date of the completion of such service according to the following schedule:

Career service recognition payments authorized by this section are:

(1)The Division of Higher Education may develop and establish a merit increase pay system for employees of all institutions of higher education covered by this subchapter.

The lump-sum payments authorized in this section shall be considered as salary for the purposes of retirement eligibility.

The merit increase pay system shall be reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 763 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” twice.

As used in this section, “merit increase pay system” means a merit-based pay system that incorporates pay and performance evaluation standards and establishes criteria for payments for employees who meet requisite performance categories.

Merit payments may be awarded to employees who satisfy performance evaluation-based criteria developed by institutions in accordance with procedures and policies developed and approved by the division after review by the Legislative Council.

(1)In order for an institution of higher education to recruit and retain information technology professionals in classified positions, the Division of Higher Education may develop and implement a plan for labor market rates up to the midpoint allowed for the grade after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

An institution of higher education implementing a labor market rate under subsection (a) of this section shall report any salary adjustments made to the:

Effective Dates. Acts Dec. 23, 1842, § 35, p. 27: Jan. 1, 1843.

Acts 1977, No. 333, § 6: Mar. 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of uniform advance fees to be charged for causes of action by the clerks in the various circuit and chancery courts of this State is necessary to provide for the efficient operation of said offices and to minimize the necessity of maintaining separate accounts for various fees; that the fees charged by county recorders are not now adequate to reimburse the county for the service of recording instruments, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to promote the efficient administration of justice in this State and to enable counties to recover reasonable fees for services rendered by recorders. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4.

21-5-1405. Division of Higher Education — Duties.

The Division of Higher Education shall perform the following administrative duties with respect to the institution of higher education classification and compensation plan, subject to this subchapter:

To ensure and provide for the accuracy and efficiency of this subchapter and to provide for an efficient and equitable system of personnel management, the division, with the review of the Legislative Council, shall:

Study on a continuing basis and modify and revise when necessary the current classifications, the class specifications, minimum requirements, and other requirements;

Create when necessary new classifications at an appropriate grade that will accurately describe those positions for which no appropriate classification exists;

Determine those positions that are improperly classified and reclassify those positions to the appropriate classification in accordance with this subchapter; and

Develop and implement the policies, rules, and procedures necessary for the implementation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2318-2323.